Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.270

Reduction of stock—Disposition of surplus.

Any surplus resulting from reduction of stock shall not be available for dividends or other distribution to stockholders except upon liquidation.

[ 1982 c 3 s 109; 1973 c 130 s 17.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.